Louisiana, session 2026, HB80.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 9:2800.31 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2800.31. Liability of an owner or operator of a carbon dioxide storage facility or
pipeline transporting carbon dioxide for geologic storage
The owner or operator of a carbon dioxide storage facility or pipeline
transporting carbon dioxide for geologic storage shall be strictly liable for any
damages caused by an authorized release or loss of containment of carbon dioxide.